tests/verbs-epenthesis.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Past tense with epenthetic vowel":
    уһун<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : устубута
    сайын<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : сайдыбыта
    билин<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : биллибитэ
    көҺүн<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : көстүбүтэ
    эҺин<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : эстибитэ
    оҕун<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : охтубута
    салын<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : саллыбыта
    эбилин<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : эбиллибитэ
    умун<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : умнубута

  "Past tense with epenthetic vowel, pattern 2":
    тутун<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : тутуммута
    аҕын<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : аҕыммыта

  "Aorist forms of epenthetic vowel verbs":
    уһун<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : устар
    умун<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : умнар
    аҕын<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : ахтар
    тутун<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : туттар

  "Ifi forms of epenthetic vowel verbs":
    уһун<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : уһуннум
    сайын<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : сайынна
    билин<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : билиннэ
    тутун<v><tv><ifi><p3><sg> : тутунна
    аҕын<v><tv><ifi><p3><sg> : аҕынна
    көҺүн<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : көҺүннэ
    эҺин<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : эҺиннэ
    оҕун<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : оҕунна
    салын<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : салынна
    эбилин<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : эбилиннэ
    умун<v><tv><ifi><p3><sg> : умунна
